Hawaii statutes.
[§321-213] Exemptions. This part shall
not apply to:

(1) Any person under twenty-one years of age, with
parental authorization, who is participating in a controlled purchase as part
of a law enforcement activity or a study authorized by the department of health
under the supervision of law enforcement to determine the level of incidence of
tobacco sales to persons under twenty-one years of age; or

(2) Possession of tobacco products by a person under
twenty-one years of age in the course of delivery, pursuant to the direction of
the person's employer lawfully engaged in business necessitating the delivery.
[L 2015, c 122, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next